Utah statutes.
9-6-601.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Museum" means an organized and permanent nonprofit institution, essentially educational or aesthetic in purpose, with permanent staff, which:

(a)  owns or utilizes tangible collections;

(b)  cares for them; and

(c)  exhibits them to the public on a regular schedule.

(2)  "Office" means the Office of Museum Services.

(3) (a)  "Pass-through funding" means funds appropriated by the Legislature to a state agency that are intended to be passed through the state agency to:

(i)  local governments;

(ii)  other government agencies;

(iii)  private organizations, including not-for-profits; or

(iv)  persons in the form of a loan or grant.

(b)  The funding may be:

(i)  general funds, federal funds, dedicated credits, or any combination of funding sources; and

(ii)  ongoing or one-time.

